Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3701
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3701 to 71-3706 shall be known and may be cited as the Brain Injury Assistance Act.

Laws 2019, LB481, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB971, § 1.